Massachusetts, session 194th, S2927.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following 
section:- 
Section 102. Any public, private or charter school in the commonwealth, prekindergarten 
to grade 12, inclusive, shall list on their website, in a centralized and easily accessible section, 
comprehensive food and nutritional information for students who require medically restricted 
diets, including students with celiac disease or food allergies. The website shall include, but not 
be limited to, the following information: 
(i) policies and procedures for safe food handling of gluten-free and allergen-free meals; 
(ii) monthly gluten-free and allergen-free menus and nutritional information; 
(iii) instructions for enrollment and access to these meals; 
(iv) contact information for food service personnel; and  

of 2 12  (v) contact information for disability and accessibility services. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 73 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following 
section:- 
Section 21. Any public institution of higher education, established in section 5 of chapter 
15A, or private institution of higher education in the commonwealth shall list on their website, in 
a centralized and easily accessible section, comprehensive food and nutritional information for 
students who require medically restricted diets, including students with celiac disease or food 
allergies. The website shall include, but not be limited to, the following information: 
(i) policies and procedures for safe food handling of gluten-free and allergen-free meals; 
(ii) monthly gluten-free and allergen-free menus and nutritional information; 
(iii) instructions for enrollment and access to these meals; 
(iv) contact information for food service personnel; and  
(v) contact information for disability and accessibility services.